Hawaii statutes.
B. Agriculture

Note

Charcoal additives, soil nutrient enhancement research, phase
1. L 2007, c 266.

[§304A-201] Soil conservation; policy.
The State adopts the policy of cooperating with the federal, state, and other
territorial governments and agencies of the United States in carrying out the
policy and purposes specified in section 7(a) of the Act of Congress known as
the "Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act" (Public Law No.
46, 74th Congress, approved by the President of the United States,
April 27, 1935, as amended by Public Law No. 461, 74th Congress, approved
February 29, 1936). [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next